Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 3 Recruiting, Hiring, and Appointment
21-3-802. Recruitment of retired employees.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall promulgate rules providing for the recruitment of retired members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to return to employment for the state.

Before a person recruited under the Exceptional Employee Recruitment Program may be rehired by the state, the proposed employment shall be reviewed by the Legislative Council and approved by the Governor.

The retirement benefits of a person rehired pursuant to this subchapter shall terminate upon reemployment. At the conclusion of the employment, the person shall receive retirement benefits with the additional service computed in his or her retirement benefits.

The actuary of the system shall determine the actuarial cost of the additional retirement benefit attributable to the person's employment under the program.

Upon receiving certification of the cost by the Executive Director of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall transfer the actuarial cost from the fund of the agency that employed the person under the program to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (d)(2).

Cross References. Computation of length of service for veterans, §21-1-101.

Effective Dates. Acts 1953, No. 358, § 2: Mar. 28, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “It being found as a matter of fact by the legislature that certain officials in the State of Arkansas who have been elected to public office and are serving in said office may be injured in their jobs or deprived of their seniority rights by their employers because of their absence from work during the tenure of their office to the great injury and damage to said public officials, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1957, No. 242, § 2: Mar. 12, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It being found as a matter of fact by the General Assembly that certain officials in the State of Arkansas who have been elected to public office and are serving in said office may be injured in their jobs or deprived of their seniority rights by their employers because of their absence from work during the tenure of their office to the great injury and damage to said public official, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1957, No. 246, § 3: approved Mar. 12, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, it is imperative that the State co-operate with the National Guard, the Reserve components of the Armed Forces and the United States Public Health Service in establishing and carrying out their training programs, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2003, No. 471, § 2: emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is necessary for our homeland defense to have the United States Air Force Auxiliary Civil Air Patrol ready for activation if called upon; and that this act is immediately necessary because if the Civil Air Patrol is not properly prepared, the security of our nation could be compromised. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

The state or political subdivision shall continue to contribute its portion of any life or disability insurance premiums during the leave of absence on behalf of the employee, if requested, so that continuous coverage may be maintained.

Whenever any employee of a political subdivision is granted military leave for a period of fifteen (15) days per calendar year or fiscal year under the provisions of this section, the military leave will accumulate for use in succeeding calendar years or fiscal years until it totals fifteen (15) days at the beginning of the calendar year or fiscal year, for a maximum number of military leave days available in any one (1) calendar year or fiscal year to be thirty (30) days.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1991, No. 956, § 1, is also codified as §§6-17-306(f) and21-4-212(e).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “and auxiliary” in (a)(1).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1039, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2318; 2019, No. 910, § 3494.

21-3-205. Compulsory retirement of certain employees.

Subchapter 3

— Veterans Preferences

Subchapter 5

— Cooperative Education Program

Subchapter 8

— Exceptional Employee Recruitment Program